Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.244

Mortgage loan originator application—Required information—Fees.

(1) The application for a mortgage loan originator license must contain at least the following information:

(a) The name, address, date of birth, and social security number of the mortgage loan originator applicant, and any other names, dates of birth, or social security numbers previously used by the mortgage loan originator applicant, unless waived by the director; and

(b) Other information regarding the mortgage loan originator applicant's background, experience, character, and general fitness as the director may require by rule, or as deemed necessary by the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry.

(2) At the time of filing an application for a license or a license renewal under this chapter, each mortgage loan originator applicant shall pay to the director through the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry the application or renewal fee of up to one hundred fifty dollars. The director shall deposit the moneys in the financial services regulation fund.

[ 2009 c 120 s 17.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "and registry" was removed by 2013 c 29 s 1.

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.